Maryland, session 2025, HB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
6–111.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SENSITIVE LOCATION” MEANS:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1006*

HOUSE BILL 1006
(1) A SCHOOL, INCLUDING A PRESCHOOL, PRIMARY OR SECONDARY
SCHOOL, VOCATIONAL OR TRADE SCHOOL, OR COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY;
(2) A MEDICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH CARE FACILITY, INCLUDING A
HOSPITAL, A DOCTOR’S OFFICE, A HEALTH CLINIC, A VACCINATION OR TESTING
SITE, AN URGENT CARE CENTER, A SITE THAT SERVES PREGNANT INDIVIDUALS, OR
A COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER;
(3) A PLACE OF WORSHIP OR RELIGIOUS STUDY, WHETHER IN A
STRUCTURE DEDICATED TO ACTIVITIES OF FAITH OR A TEMPORARY FACILITY OR
LOCATION WHERE ACTIVITIES OF FAITH ARE TAKING PLACE;
(4) A PLACE WHERE CHILDREN GATHER, INCLUDING A PLAYGROUND,
RECREATION CENTER, CHILDCARE CENTER, BEFORE– OR AFTER–SCHOOL CARE
CENTER, FOSTER CARE FACILITY, GROUP HOME FOR CHILDREN, OR SCHOOL BUS
STOP;
(5) A SOCIAL SERVICES ESTABLISHMENT, INCLUDING A CRISIS
CENTER, DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SHELTER, VICTIMS SERVICES CENTER, CHILD
ADVOCACY CENTER, SUPERVISED VISITATION CENTER, FAMILY JUSTICE CENTER,
COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION, FACILITY THAT SERVES DISABLED PERSONS,
HOMELESS SHELTER, DRUG OR ALCOHOL COUNSELING AND TREATMENT FACILITY,
OR FOOD BANK OR PANTRY OR OTHER ESTABLISHMENT DISTRIBUTING FOOD OR
OTHER ESSENTIALS OF LIFE TO PEOPLE IN NEED;
(6) A PLACE WHERE DISASTER OR EMERGENCY RESPONSE AND
RELIEF IS BEING PROVIDED, INCLUDING ALONG EVACUATION ROUTES, WHERE
SHELTER OR EMERGENCY SUPPLIES, FOOD, OR WATER ARE BEING DISTRIBUTED, OR
REGISTRATION FOR DISASTER–RELATED ASSISTANCE OR FAMILY REUNIFICATION IS
UNDERWAY;
(7) A PLACE WHERE A FUNERAL, GRAVESIDE CEREMONY, ROSARY,
WEDDING, OR OTHER RELIGIOUS OR CIVIL CEREMONY OR OBSERVANCE OCCURS;
(8) A PLACE WHERE THERE IS AN ONGOING PARADE,
DEMONSTRATION, OR RALLY;
(9) A COURTHOUSE; AND
(10) ANY OTHER LOCATION DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL.

HOUSE BILL 1006 3
(B) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, IN CONSULTATION WITH
APPROPRIATE STAKEHOLDERS, SHALL DEVELOP GUIDELINES FOR ENTITIES
OPERATING AT SENSITIVE LOCATIONS THAT LIMIT IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AT
SENSITIVE LOCATIONS TO THE FULLEST EXTENT POSSIBLE CONSISTENT WITH
FEDERAL AND STATE LAW.
(2) A STATE AGENCY THAT OPERATES AT A SENSITIVE LOCATION
SHALL:
(I) ADOPT POLICIES CONSISTENT WITH THE GUIDELINES
DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; OR
(II) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OF
ITS DECISION NOT TO ADOPT POLICIES CONSISTENT WITH THE GUIDELINES
DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, INCLUDING:
1. AN EXPLANATION OF THE REASONS FOR NOT
ADOPTING POLICIES; AND
2. COPIES OF ANY EXISTING POLICIES RELATING TO
IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AT THE SENSITIVE LOCATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.